California statutes. Education Code
 the institution that would qualify the student to receive a federal Pell Grant. The calculation of a student’s expected family contribution shall be based on the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) application or an application determined by the Student Aid Commission to be equivalent to the FAFSA application submitted by that applicant.

(b) Commencing with the 2013–14 academic year, the California State University shall report, by March 15 of each year, on the following performance measures for the preceding academic year, to inform budget and policy decisions and promote the effective and efficient use of available resources:

(1) The number of California Community College transfer students enrolled and the percentage of California Community College transfer students as a proportion of the total number of undergraduate students enrolled.

(2) The number of new California Community College transfer students enrolled and the percentage of new California Community College transfer students as a proportion of the total number of new undergraduate students enrolled.

(3) The number of low-income students enrolled and the percentage of low-income students as a proportion of the total number of undergraduate students enrolled.

(4) The number of new low-income students enrolled and the percentage of new low-income students as a proportion of the total number of new undergraduate students enrolled.

(5) The four-year graduation rate for students who entered the university four years prior and, separately, for low-income students in that cohort.

(6) The four-year and six-year graduation rates for students who entered the university six years prior and, separately, for low-income students in that cohort.

(7) The two-year transfer graduation rate for students who entered the university two years prior and, separately, for low-income students in that cohort.

(8) The two-year and three-year transfer graduation rates for students who entered the university three years prior and, separately, for low-income students in that cohort.

(9) The two-year, three-year, and four-year transfer graduation rates for students who entered the university four years prior and, separately, for low-income students in that cohort.

(10) The number of degree
 completions annually, in total and for the following categories:

(A) Freshman entrants.

(B) California Community College transfer students.

(C) Graduate students.

(D) Low-income students.

(11) The percentage of freshman entrants who have earned sufficient course credits by the end of their first year of enrollment to indicate that they will graduate within four years.

(12) The percentage of California Community College transfer students who have earned sufficient course credits by the end of their first year of enrollment to indicate that they will graduate within two years.

(13) For all students, the total amount of funds received from all sources identified in subdivision (c) of Section 89290 for the year, divided by the number of degrees awarded that same year.

(14) For undergraduate students, the total amount of funds received from all sources identified in subdivision (c) of Section 89290 for the year expended for undergraduate education, divided by the number of undergraduate degrees awarded that same year.

(15) The average number of California State University course credits and the total course credits, including credits accrued at other institutions, accumulated by all undergraduate students who graduated, and separately for freshman entrants and California Community College transfer students.

(16) (A) The number of degree completions in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) fields, in total, and separately for undergraduate students, graduate students, and low-income students.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), “STEM fields” include, but are not necessarily limited to, all of the following: computer and information sciences, engineering and engineering technologies, biological and biomedical sciences, mathematics and statistics, physical sciences, and science technologies.

(c) Commencing with the 2017–18 academic year, the California State University shall include in the report described in subdivision (b) goals for the three academic years immediately following the academic year of the report for each of the performance measures listed under that subdivision.

(d) It is the
 intent of the Legislature that the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature review these performance measures in a collaborative process with the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, individuals with expertise in statewide accountability efforts, the University of California, the California State University, and, for purposes of data integrity and consistency, the California Community Colleges, and consider any recommendations for their modification and refinement. It is further the intent of the Legislature that any modification or refinement of these measures be guided by the legislative intent expressed in Section 66010.93.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 23, Sec. 16.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander Student Achievement Program [89297. - 89297.1.]

89297.

As used in this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a) “AANHPI” means Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander.

(b) “Program” means the AANHPI Student Achievement Program established pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 42.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

89297.1.

(a) (1) The Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander (AANHPI) Student Achievement Program is hereby established at the California State University to provide culturally responsive services to enhance student educational experiences and promote higher education success for low-income, underserved, and first-generation AANHPI students and other underrepresented students.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that this program be coordinated with the Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander (AANHPI) Student Achievement Program established at the California Community Colleges pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 79510) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7.

(b) (1) Of the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the program, up to 19 percent shall support a statewide central office at a California State University campus selected by the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, in consultation with the California Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander American Affairs.

(2) The statewide central office shall employ at least the following full-time staff:

(A) One director.

(B) One program coordinator.

(C) One program analyst.

(3) The statewide central
 office, in consultation with the California Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs, shall develop
 the criteria and process for a grant program to provide funding to qualifying California State University campuses, pursuant to subdivision (c).

(4) The statewide central office, in consultation with the office of Chancellor of the California State University and the California Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander American Affairs, shall establish an AANHPI stakeholder process for purposes of the program to facilitate the statewide central office’s ability to meet the needs of the community, including students and California State University campuses. Stakeholders shall include higher education practitioners and students.

(5) The statewide central office shall provide support to qualifying campuses, including, but not limited to, technical assistance, outreach, statewide and regional trainings, curriculum development, and capacity building.

(6) The statewide central office shall provide an annual report to the office of the Chancellor of the California State University pursuant to subdivision (d).

(7) The statewide central office shall fund an independent evaluation of the program pursuant to subdivision (e).

(c) (1) Of the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the program, at least 81 percent shall be provided to California State University campuses with the following qualifications:

(A) The campus is eligible for the Asian American and Native American Pacific Islander-Serving Institution program authorized under the federal Higher Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1059g).

(B) The campus has experience providing student support services to AANHPI students and other
 underserved students.

(C) The campus has program staff that will coordinate with campus faculty and staff to effectively deliver support services to AANHPI students.

(2) Participating campuses shall provide all of the following services:

(A) Culturally responsive learning communities.

(B) Advising and counseling services.

(C) Mental health counseling and awareness services.

(D) Career development, career readiness, and employment services.

(E) Supplemental instruction and tutoring, such as English language development and support.

(F) Asian American, Pacific Islander studies courses and curriculum development.

(G) Leadership development, internships, and mentorships.

(d) On or before March 31,
 of each year, the California State University shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature. The report shall be prepared by
 the statewide central office. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The amount of funding allocated to each participating campus.

(2) A description of the services provided by each participating campus.

(3) The number of students served by each participating campus.

(4) The number of low-income, underserved, and first-generation AANHPI students served.

(5) The number of students served who meet any of, or any combination of, the following:

(A) Completed certifications.

(B) Attained baccalaureate degrees.

(C) Transferred.

(D) Obtained a job upon completion.

(e) On or before March 31, 2026, the California State University shall submit a report evaluating the program to the Department of Finance and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature. The report shall be prepared by an independent evaluator selected
 by the office of the Chancellor of the California State University. The report shall include an assessment of the impact of the program, including a comparison of the impact of the program relative to other support strategies implemented by each participating campus for the same or similar student groups.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 17.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Students [89300. - 89348.]



  ARTICLE 1. Student Body Organizations [89300. - 89304.]

89300.

(a) A student body organization may be established at any state university under the supervision of the university officials for the purpose of providing essential activities closely related to, but not normally included as a part of, the regular instructional program of the university. The organization may also operate a campus store, a cafeteria, and other projects not inconsistent with the purposes of the university, and property of the university may be leased to the organization for those purposes.

(b) (1) The trustees may fix fees for voluntary membership in the organization established at a state university.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if a student body organization is established at any state university, upon the favorable vote of two-thirds of the students voting in an election held for this purpose, in a manner that the trustees shall prescribe, and open to all regular students enrolled in the university, the
 trustees shall fix a membership fee which shall be required of all regular, limited, and special session students attending the university. No fees shall be charged to students registering solely in extension classes.

(B) The trustees may approve an increase or decrease in the student body fee only after the fee increase or decrease has been approved by a majority of students voting in a referendum established for that purpose.

(C) The required fee shall be subject to referendum at any time upon the presentation of a petition to the president of the university containing the signatures of 10 percent of the regularly enrolled students at the university. A successful referendum shall take effect with the beginning of the academic year following that in which the election was held.

(D) Payment of membership fees pursuant to this section shall be a prerequisite to enrollment in the university, except that if sufficient funds
 are available, any state university student, subject to the regulations of the trustees establishing standards in that regard, may agree to work off the amount of the fee at the prevailing rate of the university for student assistants. The trustees may adopt regulations setting standards for determining which students shall be eligible to work off the amount of the fee.

(c) The revenues raised pursuant to this section may, in addition to expenditures for other lawful purposes involved in the operations of the student body organization, be expended to provide for the support of governmental affairs representatives who may be
 attending upon the State Legislature or upon offices and agencies in the executive branch of the state government.

(d) The trustees may fix a fee for voluntary membership in a statewide student organization that represents the students of the California State University and the student body organizations of the campuses of the California State University. The trustees shall provide students either the ability to affirmatively elect to pay this fee, or a clear and unambiguous means to decline the payment of this fee, each time the fee is assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 511, Sec. 3.   (AB 2736)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

89301.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, except as provided pursuant to Section 89707.5 with respect to nonresident students who are citizens and residents of a foreign country and who are not citizens of the United States, student body organization membership fees authorized under the provisions of Section 89300 shall be collected by the officials of the campus of the California State University, together with all tuition and material and service fees, at the time of registration, except where a student loan or grant from a recognized training program or student aid program has been delayed and there is reasonable proof that the funds will be forthcoming. Exception may also be made where changes are made during the change of program period which result in a higher fee category than paid at the time of registration. All unexpended funds and money collected on behalf of, or by, student body organizations, except funds and money collected from commercial services as provided in Section 89905, shall, with the approval of an appropriate officer of the student body organization, be deposited in trust by the chief fiscal officer of the campus. The money shall, subject to the approval of the trustees, be deposited or invested in any one or more of the following ways:

(a) Deposits in trust accounts of the centralized State Treasury system pursuant to Sections 16305 to 16305.7, inclusive, of the Government Code or in the California State University Trust Fund or in a bank or banks whose accounts are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(b) Investment certificates or withdrawable shares in state-chartered savings and loan associations and savings accounts of federal savings and loan associations, if the associations are doing business in this state and have their accounts insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation and if any money so invested or deposited is invested or deposited in certificates, shares, or accounts fully covered by the insurance.

(c) Purchase of any of the securities authorized for investment by Section 16430 of the Government Code or investment by the Treasurer in those securities.

(d) Participation in funds which are exempt from federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and which are open exclusively to nonprofit colleges, universities, and independent schools.

(e) Investment certificates or withdrawable shares in federal or state credit unions, if the credit unions are doing business in this state and have their accounts insured by the National Credit Union Administration and if any money so invested or deposited is invested or deposited in certificates, shares, or accounts fully covered by such insurance.

All moneys received by a state university from any agency of the state or federal government for the payment of student body organizations membership fees of students attending the state university shall be deposited or invested as provided above.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

89302.

All money collected by a campus of the California State University on behalf of a student body organization under Sections 89046, 89047, 89300, 89301, and 89750, shall be available for such purposes of the student body organization as are approved by the trustees.

The chief fiscal officer of each campus of the California State University shall be custodian of these moneys and provide the necessary accounting records and controls thereof.

These funds may be expended by the custodian only upon the submission of an appropriate claim schedule by officers of the student body organization.

The campus of the California State University shall be reimbursed by the student body organization an amount to cover the cost of the custodial and accounting services provided by the campus of the California State University in connection with these funds.

Student body funds used for scholarships, grants-in-aid, stipends, loans, and similar expenditures shall conform to the regulations of the trustees. The funds shall be approved by the financial aids office before the funds are expended and shall be reflected on the student’s record kept in that office. The student’s financial aid record shall include all the funds received by the student.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 119.)
-------------------------------------------

89303.

The trustees may provide for the construction of a building to serve as a student body center to be financed entirely or in part by fees required of students as authorized in Section 89304 pursuant to the provisions of the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

89304.

(a) Upon the favorable vote of two-thirds of the students voting in an election held for the purpose at a state university, in the manner the trustees shall prescribe, and open to all regular students enrolled in the state university, the trustees may establish, in addition to any other student fee the trustees are authorized to establish, a building and operating fee, not to exceed forty dollars ($40) per student per academic year, which shall be required of all students attending the state university. All unexpended funds and money collected by any state university under this section shall be available for financing, operating, and constructing a student body center. All unexpended funds collected by any state university under this section shall be deposited or invested in trust by the
 chief fiscal officer of that state university in any one or more of the following ways:

(1) Deposits in trust accounts of the centralized state treasury system pursuant to Sections 16305 to 16305.7, inclusive, of the Government Code or in the California State University Trust Fund, or in a bank or banks whose accounts are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(2) Investment certificates or withdrawable shares in state-chartered savings and loan associations and savings accounts of federal savings and loan associations, if the associations are doing business in the state and have their accounts insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation.

(3) Purchase of any of the securities authorized for investment by Section 16430 of the Government Code or investment by the Treasurer in those
 securities.

(4) Participation in funds that are exempt from federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code and that are open exclusively to nonprofit colleges, universities, and independent schools.

(5) Investment certificates or withdrawable shares in federal or state credit unions, if the credit unions are doing business in the state and have their accounts insured by the National Credit Union Administration and if any money so invested or deposited is invested or deposited in certificates, shares, or accounts fully covered by that insurance.

(b) All revenues received by the trustees under this section may be pledged for the acquisition, construction, and improvement of student body center projects pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947 (Article 2
 (commencing with Section 90010) of Chapter 8), and may also be pledged to supplement other revenue funded projects relating to debt obligations issued by the trustees pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947. This section shall not be construed as altering or permitting a change in the pledge of student body center fee revenues established in connection with debt obligations issued before the enactment of this section and pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947.

(c) (1) The chief fiscal officer of each state university shall be the custodian of funds collected by a state university under this section, and shall provide the necessary accounting records and controls thereof.

(2) The state university shall be reimbursed from the funds collected by a state university under this section in an amount to cover the cost of the
 custodial and accounting services provided by the state university in connection with these funds.

(d) The funds collected by a state university under this section may be expended by the custodian when an appropriate claim schedule is approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 188, Sec. 9.   (SB 886)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Gloria Romero Open Meetings Act of 2000 [89305. - 89307.4.]

89305.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Gloria Romero Open Meetings Act of 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

89305.1.

(a) A legislative body of a student body organization shall conduct its business in public meetings. All meetings of the legislative body shall be open and public, and all persons shall be permitted to attend any meeting of the legislative body, except as otherwise provided in this article.

(b) (1) As used in this article:

(A) “Legislative body” means any or all of the following:

(i) The governing body of any entity formed or operating pursuant to Section 89300.

(ii) The governing body of any statewide student organization that represents either the students of the California State University or the governing bodies of the student body organizations of the campuses of the California State University, or both.

(iii) A commission, committee, board, subboard, or other body, whether permanent or temporary, created by charter, resolution, or formal action of a legislative body described in clause (i) or (ii). However, an advisory committee is not a legislative body, except that a standing committee of a legislative body, irrespective of its composition, that has a continuing subject matter jurisdiction, or a meeting schedule established by charter, resolution, or formal action of a legislative body is a legislative body for purposes of this article.

(B) “Meeting” includes any congregation of a majority of the membership of a legislative body at the same time and place to hear, discuss, or deliberate upon any item that is within the subject matter jurisdiction of the legislative body to which it pertains. “Meeting” does not include, and nothing in this section imposes the requirements of this article upon, any of the following:

(i) Individual contacts or conversations between a member of a legislative body and any other person.

(ii) The attendance of a majority of the members of a legislative body at a conference or similar gathering open to the public that involves a discussion of issues of general interest to the public or to higher education of the type represented by the legislative body, provided that a majority of the members do not discuss among themselves, other than as a part of the scheduled program, business of a specified nature that is within the subject matter jurisdiction of the legislative body. Nothing in this clause is intended to allow members of the public free admission to a conference or similar gathering at which the organizers have required other participants or registrants to pay fees or charges as a condition of attendance.

(iii) The attendance of a majority of the members of a legislative body at an open and noticed meeting of another body or entity created or formed by the legislative body, provided that a majority of the members do not discuss among themselves, other than as a part of the scheduled meeting, business of a specific nature that is within the subject matter jurisdiction of the legislative body.

(iv) The attendance of a majority of the members of a legislative body at a purely social or ceremonial occasion, provided that a majority of the members do not discuss among themselves business of a specific nature that is within the subject matter jurisdiction of the legislative body.

(2) For the purposes of this section, “teleconference” means a meeting of a legislative body, the members of which are in different locations, connected by electronic means, through either audio or video, or both.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the legislative body may use teleconferencing for the benefit of the public and the legislative body in connection with any meeting or proceeding authorized by law. The teleconferenced meeting or proceeding shall comply with all requirements of this chapter and all otherwise applicable provisions of law.

(2) Teleconferencing, as authorized by this section, may be used for all purposes in connection with any meeting within the subject matter jurisdiction of the legislative body. All votes taken during a teleconferenced meeting shall be by rollcall.

(3) If the legislative body elects to use teleconferencing, it shall post agendas at all teleconference locations and conduct teleconference meetings in a manner that protects the statutory and constitutional rights of the parties or the public appearing before the legislative body. Each teleconference location shall be identified in the notice and agenda of the meeting or proceeding, and each teleconference location shall be accessible to the public. The agenda shall provide an opportunity for members of the public to address the legislative body directly pursuant to Section 89306 at each teleconference location.

(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a student body organization from providing the public with additional teleconference locations.

(e) No legislative body shall take action by secret ballot, whether preliminary or final.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

89305.4.

As used in this article, “action taken” means a collective decision made by a majority of the members of a legislative body, a collective commitment or promise by a majority of the members of a legislative body to make a positive or a negative decision, or an actual vote by a majority of the members of a legislative body when sitting as a body or entity, upon a motion, proposal, report, resolution, order, or recommendation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

89305.5.

(a) Each legislative body shall annually establish, by resolution, bylaws, or whatever other rule is required for the conduct of business by that body, the time and locations for holding regular meetings.

(b) (1) At least 72 hours before a regular meeting, the legislative body, or its designee, shall post an agenda containing a brief general description of each item of business to be transacted or discussed at the meeting, including items to be discussed in closed session. A brief general description of an item generally need not exceed 20 words. The agenda shall specify the time and location of the regular meeting and shall be posted in a location that is freely accessible to members of the public.

(2) No action or discussion shall be undertaken on any item not appearing on the posted agenda, except that a member of a legislative body, or a member of his or her staff, may briefly respond to statements made or questions posed by a person exercising his or her public testimony rights under Section 89306. In addition, on his or her own initiative or in response to questions posed by the public, a member of a legislative body, or a member of his or her staff, may ask a question for clarification, make a brief announcement, or make a brief report on his or her own activities. Furthermore, a member of a legislative body, or the body itself, subject to the rules or procedures of the legislative body, may provide a reference to staff or other resources for factual information, request staff to report back to the body at a subsequent meeting concerning any matter, or take action to direct staff to place a matter of business on a future agenda.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the legislative body may take action on items of business that do not appear on the posted agenda, but are publicly identified under any of the following conditions:

(1) Upon a determination, pursuant to Section 89306.5, by the membership of the legislative body that an emergency situation exists.

(2) Upon a determination by a two-thirds vote of the members of the legislative body present at the meeting, or, if less than two-thirds of the members are present, a unanimous vote of those members present, that there is a need to take immediate action and that the need for action came to the attention of the legislative body subsequent to the agenda being posted as specified in subdivision (b).

(3) The item was posted pursuant to subdivision (b) for a prior meeting of the legislative body occurring not more than five calendar days prior to the present meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

89305.7.

Any person may request that a copy of the agenda, or a copy of all the documents that constitute the agenda packet, of any meeting of a legislative body be mailed to that person. Upon receipt of the written request, the legislative body or its designee shall cause the requested materials to be mailed at the time the agenda is posted pursuant to Section 89305.5 or upon distribution to all, or a majority of all, of the members of a legislative body, whichever occurs first. Any request for mailed copies of agendas or agenda packets shall be valid for the calendar year in which it is filed, and shall be renewed following January 1 of each year. The legislative body may establish a fee for mailing the agenda or agenda packet, and that fee shall not exceed the cost of providing the service. Failure of the requesting person to receive the agenda or agenda packet pursuant to this section shall not constitute grounds for invalidation of the actions of the legislative body taken at the meeting for which the agenda or agenda packet was not received.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

89306.

(a) (1) Every agenda for regular meetings shall provide an opportunity for members of the public to directly address the legislative body on any item affecting higher education at the campus or statewide level, provided that no action shall be taken on any item not appearing on the agenda unless the action is otherwise authorized by subdivision (c) of Section 89305.5.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the agenda need not provide an opportunity for members of the public to address the legislative body on any item that has already been considered by a committee, composed exclusively of members of the respective legislative body at a public meeting wherein all interested members of the public were afforded the opportunity to address the committee on the item, before or during the committee’s consideration of the item, unless the item has been substantially changed, as determined by the legislative body, since the committee heard the item.

(3) Every notice for a special meeting shall provide an opportunity for members of the public to directly address the legislative body concerning any item that has been described in the notice for the meeting before or during consideration of that item.

(b) A legislative body may adopt reasonable regulations to ensure that the intent of subdivision (a) is carried out, including, but not necessarily limited to, regulations limiting the amount of time allocated for public testimony on a particular issue and for each individual speaker.

(c) A legislative body shall not prohibit public criticism of anything related to the student body organization, the legislative body, or both. Nothing in this subdivision shall confer any privilege or protection for expression beyond that otherwise provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

89306.5.

(a) A special meeting may be called at any time by the presiding officer of a legislative body, or by a majority of the membership of the legislative body, by providing written notice to each member of the legislative body, and to each local newspaper of general circulation and radio or television station that has requested notice of special meetings at least 24 hours prior to the meeting. The written notice shall specify the time and place of the meeting and the business to be transacted or discussed. No other business shall be considered at these meetings by the legislative body. Written notice may be dispensed with as to any member who, at or prior to the time the meeting convenes, provides the clerk or the secretary of the legislative body with a waiver of written notice. Written notice may also be dispensed with as to any member who is actually present at the meeting at the time it convenes.

(b) The call and notice shall be posted at least 24 hours prior to the special meeting in a location that is freely accessible to members of the public.

(c) In the case of an emergency situation involving matters upon which prompt action is necessary due to the disruption or threatened disruption of public facilities, a legislative body may hold an emergency meeting without complying with either the 24-hour notice requirement or the 24-hour posting requirement of subdivision (b), or both.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, “emergency situation” means either of the following:

(A) Work stoppage or other activity that severely impairs public health, safety, or both, as determined by a majority of the membership of the legislative body.

(B) Crippling disaster that severely impairs public health, safety, or both, as determined by a majority of the membership of the legislative body.

(2) Each local newspaper of general circulation and radio or television station that has requested notice of special meetings pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be notified by the presiding officer of the legislative body, or his or her designee, one hour prior to the emergency meeting by telephone. If necessary, the presiding officer or designee shall use all of the telephone numbers provided in the most recent request of that newspaper or station for notification of special meetings to notify the newspaper or radio of the special meeting.

(3) If telephone services are not functioning, the notice requirements of this section shall be deemed waived, and the legislative body, or designee, shall notify those newspapers, radio stations, or television stations of the fact of the holding of the emergency meeting, the purpose of the meeting, and any action taken at the meeting as soon after the meeting as possible.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 89307, the legislative body shall not meet in closed session during a meeting called pursuant to this section.

(f) All special meeting requirements prescribed in subdivision (a) shall be applicable to a meeting called pursuant to subdivision (c), with the exception of the 24-hour notice requirement.

(g) The legislative body shall post in a public place, as soon after the meeting as possible and for a minimum of 10 days, the minutes of a meeting called pursuant to subdivision (c), a list of persons who the presiding officer of the legislative body, or designee, notified or attempted to notify, a copy of the rollcall vote, and any actions taken at the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

89307.

(a) Any legislative body may hold a closed session under any of the following circumstances:

(1) A closed session with its negotiator prior to the purchase, sale, exchange, or lease of real property by or for the student body organization to grant authority to its negotiator regarding the price and terms of payment for the purchase, sale, exchange, or lease. Prior to the closed session, the legislative body shall hold an open and public session in which it identifies its negotiators, the real property or real properties that the negotiations may concern, and the person or persons with whom its negotiators may negotiate.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) A negotiator may be a member of the legislative body.

(B) “Lease” includes renewal or renegotiation of a lease.

(b) (1) Based on advice of its legal counsel, holding a closed session to confer with, or receive advice from, its legal counsel regarding a liability claim or pending litigation when discussion in open session concerning the matter would prejudice the position of the student body organization in the litigation.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, all applications of the lawyer-client privilege other than those provided in this section are hereby abrogated. This section is the exclusive
 expression of the lawyer-client privilege for purposes of conducting closed-session meetings pursuant to this article.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “litigation” means any adjudicatory proceeding, including, but not limited to, eminent domain, court proceeding, or a proceeding of an administrative body exercising its adjudicatory authority, hearing officer, or arbitrator.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, litigation shall be considered pending when any of the following circumstances exist:
